Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB887.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Ensuring Reproductive Freedom by Shielding Our Providers Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Dispenser." A person lawfully authorized to dispense mail order and Internet sales of pharmaceuticals in this Commonwealth."Pharmacy." As defined in the act of September 27, 1961 (P.L.1700, No.699), known as the Pharmacy Act.1234567891011121314151617 "Prescriber." A person who is licensed, registered or otherwise lawfully authorized to distribute, dispense or administer mifepristone, misoprostol or their generic alternatives in the course of professional practice in this Commonwealth.Section 3. Prescription label.A prescriber may request that the prescription label for mifepristone, misoprostol or their generic alternatives include the name of the prescriber's health care practice instead of the name of the prescriber. A dispenser or pharmacy shall use the name of the prescriber's health care practice if requested by a prescriber.Section 4. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 30 days.20250SB0887PN0999 - 2 - 1234567891011121314